South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S354.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - State Board of Cosmetology, relating to Practice of Esthetics Generally; and Sanitary and Safety Rules for Salons and Schools, designated as Regulation Document Number 5276, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Board of Cosmetology proposes revising its regulations regarding the practice of esthetics generally, and will consider revising R.35-20. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on January 26, 2024. ----XX----